Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1811
Purchase of slaughter livestock; violations; penalties.

Any person, firm, corporation, or association, or any agent thereof, who shall violate the provisions of sections 54-1809 to 54-1811, shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1975, LB 436, § 3;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 48.